Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1101
Corporations; real and personal property; Secretary of State; filed with; effect.

Any mortgage of real property or of both real property and goods, including fixtures, or a security interest in fixtures alone, made by a corporation which is a railroad, or by any corporation including public corporations engaged in the furnishing of electric or telephone service shall be recorded in the office of the register of deeds of the county where such property is located, and when so recorded shall be a lien on the real property and fixtures described in the mortgage or security agreement from the time of recording and on fixtures thereafter acquired subject to the mortgage or security agreement from the time of acquisition; and if the mortgage or security agreement includes goods, a copy of the mortgage or security agreement or a financing statement describing the goods by item or type shall be filed with the Secretary of State and shall be effective from the time provided in the Uniform Commercial Code, but the security interest in the goods and in goods thereafter acquired subject to the mortgage or security agreement shall be effective without refiling as long as the mortgage or security agreement remains in effect, and this lien shall be enforceable in accordance with the laws of this state governing mortgages of real estate.

Laws 1965, c. 452, § 1, p. 1434.